Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 3
KINDERGARTEN READINESS ONLINE PILOT PROGRAM

26.5-4-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

All children in the year before they are eligible to enroll in kindergarten should have access to social-emotional and academic supports that are important for school readiness;

The state should provide a wide range of choices for families to access kindergarten readiness supports, including the option for online kindergarten readiness programs; and

To receive state funding, an online kindergarten readiness program should demonstrate strong evidence of effectiveness in teaching a diverse array of children, provide evidence-based online curriculum, incorporate family engagement, and undergo periodic evaluation to measure effectiveness in preparing children to learn in kindergarten.

The general assembly therefore finds that, to best serve all families, it is appropriate for the state to support an online kindergarten readiness pilot program as a choice for parents who seek to access academic and readiness support services for their children in the year preceding kindergarten eligibility.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 710, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-302. Online kindergarten readiness pilot program - created - survey - provider selection - funding.

There is created in the department the online kindergarten readiness pilot program, referred to in this part 3 as the "pilot program", to provide funding for a voluntary, online kindergarten readiness program that serves children in the year before eligibility for kindergarten enrollment. The purposes of the pilot program are to:

Help ensure that, in the year before eligibility for kindergarten enrollment, children receive personalized, online support in reading, mathematics, and science that is developmentally appropriate;

Provide training for parents and other family members to help them assist their children in learning; and

Raise the level of kindergarten readiness for all children, including children who are in low-income families.

The department shall conduct a statewide survey to determine the number of families who would be interested in participating in the pilot program. The department shall compile and submit the results of the survey by December 1, 2022, to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and the office of state planning and budgeting.

The department shall issue a request for information for a provider to make an online kindergarten readiness program available to families statewide. At a minimum, a provider must demonstrate:

The ability to provide technology to families that choose to participate in the online program but do not have the appropriate technology to be able to do so;

The use of a curriculum that is developmentally appropriate and evidence based and has demonstrated effectiveness in preparing children to learn in kindergarten;

Strong evidence of the effectiveness of the provider's online kindergarten readiness program overall in preparing children to learn in kindergarten and in developing strong social-emotional skills in children who participate in the program; and

An effective plan for recruiting families from diverse backgrounds in all geographic areas of the state to voluntarily enroll in the program.

By May 1, 2023, based on the responses to the request for information, the department, subject to available appropriations for the 2023-24 fiscal year, may select and contract with a single provider to provide an online kindergarten readiness program. At a minimum, the contract must require the provider to provide statewide notice of the availability of the online kindergarten readiness program and begin enrolling families, free of charge, for the 2023-24 school year.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 710, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-303. Reporting.

Beginning with the hearing held in January of 2025, as part of the annual hearing held pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2, the department shall report on the implementation of the pilot program, including:

The number of children enrolled in the pilot program for the preceding fiscal year;

The number and percentage of children enrolled in the preschool program who were in low-income families and who met one or more of the qualifying factors established in department rule pursuant to section 26.5-4-204 (4)(a)(II), including identifying the qualifying factors that were met;

The demographics of the children enrolled in the pilot program, including, but not limited to, race, ethnicity, disability, and income;

Quantitative and, to the extent available, qualitative data, including student outcomes to the extent they are available, demonstrating the effectiveness of the pilot program in improving the overall learning and kindergarten readiness of children enrolled in the pilot program; and

Any additional information necessary to determine the effectiveness of the pilot program in preparing children to learn in kindergarten.

The department may request and the provider shall provide information as necessary for the department to prepare the report described in subsection (1) of this section.

The department shall annually publish on the department website the information provided in the report described in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 711, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-304. Repeal of part.

This part 3 is repealed, effective July 1, 2029.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 712, § 3, effective July 1.